Hawaii statutes.
Part II. water
infrastructure loans

[§155-31] Definitions. As used in this
part:

"Department" means the department of agriculture.

"Water infrastructure charge" means
the on-bill charges for the use and services of the loan program, including the
repayment of loans made under the loan program to be imposed on water utility
customers.

"Water infrastructure equipment"
means infrastructure improvements, equipment, and personal property to be
installed for dams, reservoirs, hydroelectric pumping, storm water reclamation,
ditch maintenance, spillways, wells, water ducts, and water distribution
systems.

"Water infrastructure loans" and "loan
program" means the program established by this part and loans made to
finance the purchase or installation of water infrastructure equipment for dams,
reservoirs, hydroelectric pumping, storm water reclamation, ditch maintenance,
spillways, wells, water ducts, and water distribution systems.

"Water infrastructure special fund"
means the special fund created pursuant to section 155-34. [L 2016, c 171, pt
of §1]

Previous
Vol03_Ch0121-0200D
Next